Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6850.2 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Insurer” means an insurer as defined pursuant to Section


6054 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “Practitioner” means a practitioner as defined pursuant to


Section 6054 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


3. “Prescription drug” or “drug” means a prescription drug as


defined pursuant to Section 367.2 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.



Req. No. 2648 Page 1


B. An insurer shall not modify an insured’s coverage of a


prescription drug if the following conditions are met:


1. The drug has been previously preauthorized for coverage by


the insurer or was listed on the formulary of the insurer at the


time the insured was prescribed the drug by his or her practitioner;


2. The insured has already received the drug; and


3. A practitioner continued to prescribe the drug to the


insured.


C. Modification prohibited under this section shall include,


but not be limited to:


1. Increasing the premium, co-payment, coinsurance, or


deductible;


2. Denying or otherwise failing to provide continued coverage


of the prescription drug;


3. Moving the drug to a more restrictive coverage category or


tier; or


4. Replacing the brand-name drug for a generic drug after the


insured has qualified for the brand-name drug pursuant to this


section.


D. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an


insurer from modifying coverage of a prescription drug if:


1. The United States Food and Drug Administration has issued a


statement calling into question the clinical safety of the drug; or



Req. No. 2648 Page 2


2. The manufacturer of the drug has notified the United States


Food and Drug Administration of a manufacturing discontinuance or


potential discontinuance of the drug, as required by 21 U.S.C.,


Section 356c.


E. Any insurer that violates the provisions of this section


shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount to be determined by


the Insurance Commissioner. The Insurance Commissioner shall


promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2648 CAD 12/29/2025 9:10:33 AM



























Req. No. 2648 Page 3